Utah statutes.
73-19-6.   Ratification.

The Columbia Interstate Compact entered into at Portland, Oregon, on the 8th day of October, 1962, by the Columbia River Basin states, namely Idaho, Montana, Nevada, Oregon, Utah, Washington, and Wyoming, by the representatives of those states with the approval of the representative of the United States of America is unconditionally ratified, approved and confirmed for and by the state of Utah.

